Massachusetts, session 194th, H614.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1A of Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following:-
The commissioner shall issue guidelines, based off of available best practices, for school
districts and charter schools on the usage of artificial intelligence (AI) programs by students and
the utilization of these programs in the classroom by educators to enhance learning. The
guidance shall include the benefits and limitations of AI in education; how to promote the safe
use of AI by students and teachers; the equity implications of the use of AI in the classroom; and
what factors schools should consider when setting policies concerning the use of AI. In
developing such guidance, the department shall hold a minimum of three public hearings to
gather input from relevant stakeholders including, but not limited to, superintendent groups,
school leaders, and teachers to determine what policies and procedures pertaining to the use of
of 2

AI is needed in schools. The commissioner shall update said guidelines as necessary and
annually publish them on the department’s website no later than September 1.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect immediately upon its passage.
of 2